Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1524.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of transportation; Navajo Route 8070; exemption a. The sum of $3,200,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of transportation to grade, improve drainage, gravel and stabilize Navajo Route 8070. B. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.